Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Dentists

§ 601.
License by examination.

To be eligible for licensure as a dentist, an applicant shall:

have attained the age of majority;

be a graduate of:

a dental college accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association; or

a program of foreign dental training and a postgraduate program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association that is acceptable to the Board; and

meet the certificate, examination, and training requirements established by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 602.
License by endorsement.

The Board may grant a license to practice dentistry to an applicant who is a graduate of a dental college accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association and who:

is currently licensed in good standing to practice dentistry in any jurisdiction of the United States or Canada that has licensing requirements deemed by the Board to be substantially equivalent to those of this State;

has successfully completed an approved emergency office procedures course;

has successfully completed the dentist jurisprudence examination; and

has met active practice requirements and any other requirements established by the Board by rule.

The Board may grant a license to an applicant who is a graduate of a dental college accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association and who is licensed and in good standing to practice dentistry in a jurisdiction of the United States or Canada that has licensing requirements deemed by the Board to be not substantially equivalent to those of this State if:

the Board has determined that the applicant’s practice experience or education overcomes any lesser licensing requirement of the other jurisdiction in which the applicant is licensed; and

the applicant:

has been in full-time licensed practice of at least 1,200 hours per year for a minimum of five years preceding the application;

is in good standing in all jurisdictions in which licensed;

has successfully completed an approved emergency office procedures course;

has successfully completed the dentist jurisprudence examination; and

has met active practice requirements and any other requirements established by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.